src/morphology/affixes/digits.lexc
!! Digit strings inflect with colons, lot like abbreviations.

LEXICON DIGITS_YKSI
!! The digit strings ending in digit 1 pronounced as number
!!€gt-norm:
!!€ 1:       1+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€ 1:t:     1+Num+Card+Pl+Nom
!!€ 1:ssä:   1+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KAKSI
!! The digit strings ending in digit 2 pronounced as number
!!€ 2:
!!€ 2:t:
!!€ 2:ssa:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KOLME
!! The digit strings ending in digit 3 pronounced as number
!!€ 3:
!!€ 3:t:
!!€ 3:ssa:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:a DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_NELJÄ
!! The digit strings ending in digit 4 pronounced as number
!!€ 4:
!!€ 4:t:
!!€ 4:ssä:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:ään   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_VIISI
!! The digit strings ending in digit 5 pronounced as number
!!€ 5:
!!€ 5:t:
!!€ 5:ssä:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
