src/morphology/stems/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_INT_LOOP
1+Num+Card:1   DIGITS_YKSI  ;
2+Num+Card:2   DIGITS_KAKSI ;
3+Num+Card:3   DIGITS_KOLME ;
4+Num+Card:4   DIGITS_NELJÄ ;
5+Num+Card:5   DIGITS_VIISI ;
